District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.74

Sales of notes.

All notes issued pursuant to this part may be sold at not less than par and accrued interest at private sale without previous advertising.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 806, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 474

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-330.
1973 Ed., § 47-250.